test/src/gt-desc-yamls/sme-tests_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen:   ../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - bietna: # GOAHTI-A
    bietna+N+Sg+Nom: bietna
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: bietname
    bietna+N+Sg+Acc: biena
    bietna+N+Sg+Ill: bitnii
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc: [bienas, bienan]
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: bienastan
    bietna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: bienastat
    bietna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: bienainan
    bietna+N+Pl+Acc: bienaid
    bietna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: bienaidasat
    bietna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: bienaideameguin
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: bienaš
    bietna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: bienažis
    bietna+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: bienalažžan

  Noun - beaivi: # GOAHTI-I
    beaivi+N+Sg+Nom: beaivi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen: [beaivvi, beaivve]
    beaivi+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: beaiváme
    beaivi+N+Sg+Acc: beaivvi
    beaivi+N+Sg+Ill: beaivái
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc: [beaivvis, beaivvin]
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: beaivvistan
    beaivi+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: beaivvistat
    beaivi+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: beivviinan
    beaivi+N+Pl+Acc: beivviid
    beaivi+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: beivviidasat
    beaivi+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: beivviideameguin
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: beaivváš
    beaivi+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: beaivvážis
    beaivi+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: beaivválažžan

  Noun - joavku: # GOAHTI-U
    joavku+N+Sg+Nom: joavku
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen: [joavkku, joavkko]
    joavku+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: jovkome
    joavku+N+Sg+Acc: joavkku
    joavku+N+Sg+Ill: jovkui
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc: [joavkkus, joavkkun]
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: joavkkustan
    joavku+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: joavkkustat
    joavku+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: joavkkuinan
    joavku+N+Ess: joavkun
    joavku+N+Pl+Nom: joavkkut
    joavku+N+Pl+Gen: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Acc: joavkkuid
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill: joavkkuide
    joavku+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: joavkkuidasat
    joavku+N+Pl+Loc: joavkkuin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com: joavkkuiguin
    joavku+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: joavkkuideameguin
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: jovkkoš
    joavku+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: jovkkožis
    joavku+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: jovkkolažžan

  Noun - diehtu: # ALBMI
    diehtu+N+Sg+Nom: diehtu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: dihtome
    diehtu+N+Sg+Acc: dieđu
    diehtu+N+Sg+Ill: dihtui
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc: [dieđus, dieđun]
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: dieđustan
    diehtu+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: dieđustat
    diehtu+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: dieđuinan
    diehtu+N+Pl+Acc: dieđuid
    diehtu+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: dieđuidasat
    diehtu+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: dieđuideameguin
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: diđoš
    diehtu+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: diđožis
    diehtu+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: diđolažžan

  Noun - čoalli: # AIGI
    čoalli+N+Sg+Nom: čoalli
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen: [čoali, čoale]
    čoalli+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: čoalláme
    čoalli+N+Sg+Acc: čoali
    čoalli+N+Sg+Ill: čoallái
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc: [čoalis, čoalin]
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: čoalistan
    čoalli+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: čoalistat
    čoalli+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: čoliinan
    čoalli+N+Pl+Acc: čoliid
    čoalli+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: čoliidasat
    čoalli+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: čoliideameguin
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: čoaláš
    čoalli+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: čoalážis
    čoalli+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: čoalálažžan

  Noun - proseassa: # STAHTA
    proseassa+N+Sg+Nom: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Gen: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: proseassame
    proseassa+N+Sg+Acc: proseassa
    proseassa+N+Sg+Ill: prosessii
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc: [proseassas, proseassan]
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: proseassastan
    proseassa+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: proseassastat
    proseassa+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: proseassainan
    proseassa+N+Pl+Acc: proseassaid
    proseassa+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: proseassaidasat
    proseassa+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: proseassaideameguin
    proseassa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: proseassaš
    proseassa+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: proseassažis
    proseassa+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: proseassalažžan

  Noun - kopiija: # IIJA
    kopiija+N+Sg+Nom: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: kopiijame
    kopiija+N+Sg+Acc: kopiija
    kopiija+N+Sg+Ill: [kopiijai, kopiijii]
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc: [kopiijas, kopiijan]
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: kopiijastan
    kopiija+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: kopiijastat
    kopiija+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: kopiijainan
    kopiija+N+Pl+Acc: kopiijaid
    kopiija+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: kopiijaidasat
    kopiija+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: kopiijaideameguin
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: kopiijaš
    kopiija+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: kopiijažis
    kopiija+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: kopiijalažžan

  Noun - eappir: # MALIS
    eappir+N+Sg+Nom: eappir
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen: eabbára
    eappir+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: eabbáreame
    eappir+N+Sg+Acc: eabbára
    eappir+N+Sg+Ill: eabbárii
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc: eabbáris
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: eabbáristtán
    eappir+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: eabbáristtát
    eappir+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: eabbáriinnán
    eappir+N+Ess: eappirin
    eappir+N+Pl+Nom: eabbárat
    eappir+N+Pl+Gen: eabbáriid
    eappir+N+Pl+Acc: eabbáriid
    eappir+N+Pl+Ill: eabbáriidda
    eappir+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: eabbáriiddásat
    eappir+N+Pl+Loc: eabbáriin
    eappir+N+Pl+Com: eabbáriiguin
    eappir+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: eabbáriiddámeguin
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: eabbáraš
    eappir+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [eabbáraččas, eabbáraččan]
    eappir+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: eappirlažžan

  Noun - guora: # SEAMU
    guora+N+Sg+Nom: guora
    guora+N+Sg+Gen: guorraga
    guora+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorrageame
    guora+N+Sg+Acc: guorraga
    guora+N+Sg+Ill: guorragii
    guora+N+Sg+Loc: guorragis
    guora+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: guorragisttán
    guora+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: guorragisttát
    guora+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorragiinnán
    guora+N+Pl+Acc: guorragiid
    guora+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: guorragiiddásat
    guora+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorragiiddámeguin
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guorragaš
    guora+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [guorragaččas, guorragaččan]
    guora+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: guoralažžan

  Noun - guorbban: # GAHPIR
    guorbban+N+Sg+Nom: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen: guorbbana
    guorbban+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: guorbbaneame
    guorbban+N+Sg+Acc: guorbban
    guorbban+N+Sg+Ill: guorbbanii
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc: guorbbanis
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: guorbbanisttán
    guorbban+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: guorbbanisttát
    guorbban+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: guorbbaniinnán
    guorbban+N+Pl+Acc: guorbbaniid
    guorbban+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: guorbbaniiddásat
    guorbban+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: guorbbaniiddámeguin
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: guorbbanaš
    guorbban+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: [guorbbanaččas, guorbbanaččan]
    guorbban+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: guorbbanlažžan

  Noun - guoru: # SUOLU
    guoru+N+Sg+Nom: guoru
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen: gurro
    guoru+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: gurrome
    guoru+N+Sg+Acc: gurro
    guoru+N+Sg+Ill: gurrui
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc: [gurros, gurron]
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: gurrostan
    guoru+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: gurrostat
    guoru+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: gurruinan
    guoru+N+Pl+Acc: gurruid
    guoru+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: gurruidasat
    guoru+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: gurruideameguin
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: gurroš
    guoru+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: gurrožis

  Noun - riekkis: # LASIS
    riekkis+N+Sg+Nom: riekkis
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen: rieggá
    riekkis+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: rieggáme
    riekkis+N+Sg+Acc: rieggá
    riekkis+N+Sg+Ill: rieggái
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc: [rieggás, rieggán]
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: rieggástan
    riekkis+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: rieggástat
    riekkis+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: rieggáinan
    riekkis+N+Pl+Acc: rieggáid
    riekkis+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: rieggáidasat
    riekkis+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: rieggáideameguin
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: rieggáš
    riekkis+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: rieggážis

  Noun - infrastruktuvra: # STRUKTUR
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrame
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Acc: infrastruktuvrra
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Ill: infrastruktuvrii
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc: [infrastruktuvrras, infrastruktuvrran]
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrastan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrrastat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: infrastruktuvrrainan
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Acc: infrastruktuvrraid
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: infrastruktuvrraidasat
    infrastruktuvra+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: infrastruktuvrraideameguin
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: infrastruktuvrraš
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: infrastruktuvrražis
    infrastruktuvra+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: infrastruktuvrralažžan

  Noun - insuliidna: # ADRENALIN
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Nom: insuliidna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: insuliidname
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Acc: insuliinna
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Ill: insuliidnii
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc: [insuliinnas, insuliinnan]
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: insuliinnastan
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: insuliinnastat
    insuliidna+N+Sg+Com+PxSg1: insuliinnainan
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Acc: insuliinnaid
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: insuliinnaidasat
    insuliidna+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: insuliinnaideameguin
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom: insuliinnaš
    insuliidna+N+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Loc: insuliinnažis
    insuliidna+N+Der/laš+A+Ess: insuliinnalažžan

  Noun - leaŋggat: # BUVSSAT
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Acc: leaŋggaid
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Ill+PxSg2: leaŋggaidasat
    leaŋggat+N+Pl+Com+PxDu1: leaŋggaideameguin
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Nom: leaŋggažat
    leaŋggat+N+Der/Dimin+N+Pl+Loc: leaŋggažiin

  Noun - fierdin: # BOAHTIN
    fierdin+Sg+Nom: fierdin
    fierdin+Sg+Gen: [fierdin, fierdima]
    fierdin+Sg+Acc: fierdima
    fierdin+Sg+Ill: fierdimii
    fierdin+Sg+Loc: fierdimis
    fierdin+Pl+Acc: fierdimiid
    fierdin+Pl+Com: fierdimiiguin

  Adj - sealvi: # LAIKI
    sealvi+A+Attr: sealvves
    sealvi+A+Sg+Nom: sealvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Gen: sealvvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Acc: sealvvi
    sealvi+A+Sg+Ill: sealvái
    sealvi+A+Sg+Loc: [sealvvis, sealvvin]
    sealvi+A+Pl+Acc: selvviid
    sealvi+A+Pl+Com: selvviiguin
    sealvi+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: sealvvit
    sealvi+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: sealvvibuid
    sealvi+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: sealvvimus
    sealvi+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: sealvvimusain
    sealvi+A+Der/at+Adv: sealvvit
    
  Adj - molsašuddi: # HAHTTI
    molsašuddi+A+Attr: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Nom: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Gen: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Acc: molsašuddi
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Ill: molsašuddái
    molsašuddi+A+Sg+Loc: [molsašuddis, molsašuddin]
    molsašuddi+A+Pl+Acc: molsašuddiid
    molsašuddi+A+Pl+Com: molsašuddiiguin

  Adj - šealgat: # VIELG
    šealgat+A+Attr: šelges
    šealgat+A+Sg+Nom: šealgat
    šealgat+A+Sg+Gen: [šealgada, šealgat]
    šealgat+A+Sg+Acc: [šealgada, šealgat]
    šealgat+A+Sg+Ill: šealgadii
    šealgat+A+Sg+Loc: šealgadis
    šealgat+A+Pl+Acc: šealgadiid
    šealgat+A+Pl+Com: šealgadiiguin
    šealgat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeabbo, šealgadabbo, šealgadut, šealgadit, šealgadet, šealgadat, šealgadeabbu, šealgadabbu]
    šealgat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: [šealgadeappuid, šealgadabbuid]
    šealgat+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: [šealgadeamos, šealgadamos, šealgadeamus]
    šealgat+A+Superl+Pl+Loc: šealgadepmosiin
    šealgat+A+Der/at+Adv: šealgadit

  Adj - čuolmmaheapme: # JEAGOHEAPMI
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Attr: čuolmmahis
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Nom: čuolmmaheapme
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Gen: [čuolmmaheame, čuolmmaheami]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Acc: [čuolmmaheame, čuolmmaheami]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Ill: čuolmmaheapmái
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Sg+Loc: [čuolmmaheames, čuolmmaheamis, čuolmmaheamen, čuolmmaheamin]
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Pl+Acc: čuolmmahemiid
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Pl+Com: čuolmmahemiiguin
    čuolmmaheapme+A+Der/at+Adv: čuolmmaheamit
